Texas statutes.
SPECIAL DISTRICT LOCAL LAWS CODE

TITLE 6. WATER AND WASTEWATER

SUBTITLE H. DISTRICTS GOVERNING GROUNDWATER

CHAPTER 8862. MIDDLE TRINITY GROUNDWATER CONSERVATION DISTRICT

SUBCHAPTER A. GENERAL PROVISIONS

Sec. 8862.001. DEFINITIONS. In this chapter:

(1) "Board" means the district's board of directors.

(2) "Director" means a board member.

(3) "District" means the Middle Trinity Groundwater Conservation District.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 112 (S.B. 1026), Sec. 1.05, eff. April 1, 2015.

Sec. 8862.002. NATURE OF DISTRICT. The district is a groundwater conservation district created under and essential to accomplish the purposes of Section 59, Article XVI, Texas Constitution.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 112 (S.B. 1026), Sec. 1.05, eff. April 1, 2015.

Sec. 8862.003. FINDINGS OF PUBLIC USE AND BENEFIT. (a) The district is created to serve a public use and benefit.

(b) All land and other property included in the district will benefit from the works and projects accomplished by the district under the powers conferred by Section 59, Article XVI, Texas Constitution.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 112 (S.B. 1026), Sec. 1.05, eff. April 1, 2015.

Sec. 8862.004. DISTRICT TERRITORY. The district's boundaries are coextensive with the boundaries of Erath, Comanche, Bosque, and Coryell Counties, unless the district's territory has been modified under:

(1) Subchapter J or K, Chapter 36, Water Code; or

(2) other law.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 112 (S.B. 1026), Sec. 1.05, eff. April 1, 2015.

SUBCHAPTER B. BOARD OF DIRECTORS

Sec. 8862.051. COMPOSITION OF BOARD; TERMS. (a) Except as provided by Subsection (c) and Sections 8862.055 and 8862.056, the district is governed by a board of six directors.

(b) Directors serve staggered four-year terms.

(c) The board by resolution may change the number of directors elected from a county in the district for the purpose of equalizing representation of the residents of the district.

(d) Section 36.051(a), Water Code, does not apply to the district.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 112 (S.B. 1026), Sec. 1.05, eff. April 1, 2015.

Sec. 8862.052. ELECTION OF DIRECTORS. Except as provided by Sections 8862.051(c) and 8862.056, three directors shall be elected from each county in the district.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 112 (S.B. 1026), Sec. 1.05, eff. April 1, 2015.

Sec. 8862.053. ELECTION DATE. Except as provided by Sections 8862.055 and 8862.056, each even-numbered year, on the uniform election date in May or another date authorized by law, the appropriate number of directors shall be elected.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 112 (S.B. 1026), Sec. 1.05, eff. April 1, 2015.

Sec. 8862.054. QUALIFICATION FOR OFFICE. To be qualified to be a candidate for or serve as director, a person must be a registered voter in the county the person seeks to represent.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 112 (S.B. 1026), Sec. 1.05, eff. April 1, 2015.

Sec. 8862.055. COMPOSITION OF BOARD AND ELECTION OF DIRECTORS FOLLOWING ANNEXATION OF ONE OR TWO COUNTIES. (a) This section applies only following the annexation by the district under Subchapter J, Chapter 36, Water Code, of the territory of one or two additional counties.

(b) Not later than the 90th day after the date of an election in which the annexation of a county to the district is ratified by a majority vote of the voters of that county, the commissioners court of the annexed county shall appoint three temporary directors to the board. Temporary directors serve until initial permanent directors are elected under Subsection (c).

(c) In the first odd-numbered year following the election in which annexation of a county is ratified, on the uniform election date in May or another date authorized by law, initial permanent directors shall be elected from that county. The initial permanent directors from the county shall draw lots to determine who will serve a four-year term and who will serve a two-year term.

(d) In each odd-numbered year following the election of initial permanent directors under Subsection (c), on the uniform election date in May or another date authorized by law, the appropriate number of directors from the annexed county shall be elected.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 112 (S.B. 1026), Sec. 1.05, eff. April 1, 2015.

Sec. 8862.056. COMPOSITION OF BOARD AND ELECTION OF DIRECTORS FOLLOWING ANNEXATION OF MORE THAN TWO COUNTIES. (a) This section applies only following the annexation by the district under Subchapter J, Chapter 36, Water Code, of the territory of a third additional county or the simultaneous or subsequent annexation of the territory of other additional counties.

(b) After annexation, two directors shall be elected from each county in the district as provided by this section.

(c) Not later than the 90th day after the date of an election in which the annexation of a county is ratified by a majority vote of the voters of that county, the commissioners court of each annexed county shall appoint two temporary directors to the board. Temporary directors serve until initial permanent directors are elected under Subsection (d).

(d) In the first odd-numbered year following the election in which annexation of a county is ratified, on the uniform election date in May or another date authorized by law, initial permanent directors shall be elected from that county. The initial permanent directors from the county shall draw lots to determine who will serve a four-year term and who will serve a two-year term.

(e) On the date of the next regularly scheduled directors' election in an even-numbered year following the election in which annexation of a county is ratified:

(1) one director position from Comanche County and one director position from Erath County are abolished; and

(2) the terms of the directors serving in those positions expire on the date of the election.

(f) On the date of the next regularly scheduled directors' election in an odd-numbered year following the election in which annexation of the county is ratified:

(1) one director position from each of the first two counties annexed by the district is abolished; and

(2) the terms of the directors serving in those positions expire on the date of the election.

(g) If more than one position described by Subsection (e)(1) or (f)(1) is scheduled for election in Comanche County, Erath County, or one of the first two counties annexed by the district, the directors of the county shall draw lots to determine which position shall be abolished in accordance with Subsections (e) and (f).

(h) Each odd-numbered year following the election of initial permanent directors under Subsection (d), on the uniform election date in May or another date authorized by law, the appropriate number of directors from the annexed county shall be elected.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 112 (S.B. 1026), Sec. 1.05, eff. April 1, 2015.

SUBCHAPTER C. POWERS AND DUTIES

Sec. 8862.101. GROUNDWATER CONSERVATION DISTRICT POWERS AND DUTIES. The district has the rights, powers, privileges, functions, and duties provided by the general law of this state, including Chapter 36, Water Code, applicable to groundwater conservation districts created under Section 59, Article XVI, Texas Constitution.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 112 (S.B. 1026), Sec. 1.05, eff. April 1, 2015.

Sec. 8862.102. DISTRICT RULES; ENFORCEMENT. (a) Any rules adopted by the district as authorized by this chapter and Chapter 36, Water Code, apply to all persons and entities except as exempted under Section 36.117, Water Code.

(b) The district may enforce its rules and the provisions of Chapter 36, Water Code, in the manner authorized by that chapter. In addition to the remedies provided under Section 36.102, Water Code, the district may impose a fee on a person or entity for violation of a rule of the district or failure to comply with an order issued by the district.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 112 (S.B. 1026), Sec. 1.05, eff. April 1, 2015.

SUBCHAPTER D. GENERAL FINANCIAL PROVISIONS

Sec. 8862.151. MAINTENANCE AND OPERATION TAX. To pay the maintenance and operating expenses of the district, the board of directors may impose taxes annually at a rate not to exceed five cents on each $100 of assessed valuation.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 112 (S.B. 1026), Sec. 1.05, eff. April 1, 2015.